Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-103
Vacancies; appointment.

The Governor shall fill all vacancies in the office of commissioner by appointment, and a person so appointed shall fill such office for the unexpired term.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 3, p. 1355.